Virginia statutes. Title 53.1. Prisons and Other Methods of Correction.
Chapter 10. Commitment of Aliens.

§ 53.1-218.
Duty of officer in charge to inquire as to citizenship; notice to federal immigration officer of commitment of alien.

Whenever any person is committed to a correctional facility for the commission of a felony, the director, sheriff or other officer in charge of such facility shall inquire as to whether the person (i) was born in a country other than the United States and (ii) is a citizen of a country other than the United States. The director, sheriff or other officer in charge of such facility shall make an immigration alien query to the Law Enforcement Support Center of the U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement for any person committed to the facility for the commission of a felony who (i) was born in a country other than the United States and (ii) is a citizen of a country other than the United States, or for whom the answer to clause (i) or (ii) is unknown.

In the case of a jail, the sheriff, or other officer in charge of such facility shall communicate the results of any immigration alien query that confirm that the person is illegally present in the United States to the Local Inmate Data System of the State Compensation Board. The State Compensation Board shall communicate, on a monthly basis, the results of any immigration alien query that results in a confirmation that the person is illegally present in the United States to the Central Criminal Records Exchange of the Department of State Police in a format approved by the Exchange.

In the case of a correctional facility of the Department of Corrections, the director or other officer in charge of such facility shall communicate the results of any immigration alien query that results in a confirmation that the person is illegally present in the United States to the Central Criminal Records Exchange of the Department of State Police in a format approved by the Exchange.

The information received by the Central Criminal Records Exchange concerning the person’s immigration status shall be recorded in the person’s criminal history record.

However, notification shall not be made to the Central Criminal Records Exchange if it is apparent that a report on alien status has previously been made to the Exchange pursuant to §

19.2-83.2

or

19.2-294.2

.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 53-313, 53-314; 1970, c. 648; 1982, c. 636; 1985, c. 247; 1994, c. 579; 2008, cc. 180, 415; 2014, c. 641; 2020, cc. 995, 996.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, cc. 180 and 415, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Compensation Board shall maintain in the Local Inmate Data System, and the Department of Corrections shall maintain in its offender management system, a specific data field for the entry of the response received from the Law Enforcement Support Center of the United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement pursuant to the request made in accordance with §

19.2-83.2

or

53.1-218

of the Code of Virginia for information on an inmate’s immigration status.”

Acts 2008, cc. 180 and 415, cl. 3 provides: “That the Department of Corrections shall confirm the validity of the social security numbers given by inmates and omit from its database those social security numbers determined to be fictitious.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 180 and 415 are identical and rewrote the section.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 641, in the second paragraph, inserted “that confirm that the person is illegally present in the United States.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 995 and 996 are identical, and in the first paragraph in the first sentence, inserted “for the commission of a felony” and in the second sentence, substituted “U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement for any person committed to the facility for the commission of a felony” for “United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement for any person”; in the last paragraph, substituted “shall” for “need” and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For essay “In the Aftermath of Soering, Is Interstate Extradition to Virginia Illegal?”, see 48 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1477 (1991).

§ 53.1-219.
Duty of clerk to furnish copy of complaint, indictment, judgment and sentence.

Upon the official request of the United States immigration officer in charge of the territory or district in which is located any court committing any alien to any correctional facility for the commission of a felony, it shall be the duty of the clerk of such court to furnish without charge a certified copy, in duplicate, of the complaint, information or indictment and the judgment and sentence and any other records pertaining to the case of the convicted alien.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-315; 1982, c. 636; 2020, cc. 995, 996.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 995 and 996 are identical, and inserted “for the commission of a felony.”

Law Review.

For essay “In the Aftermath of Soering, Is Interstate Extradition to Virginia Illegal?”, see 48 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1477 (1991).

§ 53.1-220.
Transfer of prisoners pursuant to treaty.

When a treaty between the United States and a foreign country provides for the transfer to such foreign country, with the consent of the appropriate state authorities, of convicted offenders in state correctional systems who are citizens or nationals of such foreign country, the Governor is authorized, subject to the terms of such treaty, to act on behalf of the Commonwealth and to consent to the transfer of such convicted offenders.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-315.1; 1978, c. 620; 1982, c. 636.

Law Review.

For essay “In the Aftermath of Soering, Is Interstate Extradition to Virginia Illegal?”, see 48 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1477 (1991).

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Revocation of consent. —

Governor did not violate §

53.1-220

when revoking the Commonwealth’s consent to the transfer of a prisoner to Germany pursuant to the Council of Europe’s Convention on Transfer of Sentenced Persons. The federal enabling legislation, 18 U.S.C.S. § 4107(b)(4), was silent as to whether a state government or the federal government was able to revoke consent, and the U.S. Attorney General specifically stated that there was nothing in the Convention or federal law that prohibited the governor from revoking consent prior to the physical transfer of the prisoner. Soering v. McDonnell, 84 Va. Cir. 564, 2012 Va. Cir. LEXIS 51 (Richmond July 11, 2012).

§ 53.1-220.1.
Transfer of prisoners convicted of designated illegal acts.

With the consent of the appropriate state authorities, the Immigration and Naturalization Service may, following notification under §

19.2-294.2

, take physical custody of and responsibility for any alien convicted of any (i) felony offense involving murder, rape, robbery, burglary, larceny, extortion, or abduction, or (ii) illegal drug violation designated as a felony under Article 1 (§

18.2-247

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 18.2. The director, sheriff or other official in charge of the facility in which such alien is incarcerated may enter into an agreement, which includes provisions relating to reimbursement, with the Immigration and Naturalization Service to retain custody or supervision of such alien until he is deported or until other mutually satisfactory arrangements are made to transfer custody of such alien to the Service.

History.

1985, c. 247.

Law Review.

For essay “In the Aftermath of Soering, Is Interstate Extradition to Virginia Illegal?”, see 48 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1477 (1991).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Aliens, § 4.

§ 53.1-220.2.
Transfer of certain incarcerated persons to Immigration and Customs Enforcement.

The Director, sheriff, or other official in charge of the facility in which an alien is incarcerated may, upon receipt of a detainer from U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement, transfer custody of the alien to U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement no more than five days prior to the date that he would otherwise be released from custody. Upon transfer of custody, notwithstanding any other provision of law, the alien shall receive credit for the number of days remaining before he would otherwise have been released.

History.

2015, cc. 102, 211.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

ICE detainer is merely a request. —

Attorney General declined to change opinion in 2015 opinion No. 14-067, 2015 Va. AG LEXIS 1 (1/5/15), stating that issuance of an I-247A Immigration Detainer, whether or not accompanied by an

1-200

Warrant for Arrest of Alien, does not obligate or authorize local law-enforcement to detain or arrest individuals for civil violations of immigration laws, unless the local law-enforcement agency has entered into a § 287(g) agreement with federal authorities authorizing and directing such action. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Scott Surovell, Member of the Virginia Senate, 18-050, 2019 Va. AG LEXIS 10 (4/12/19).